Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,212
Judgment against claimant; transmitted to other counties; how collected.

In any action in which a judgment is rendered in any sum, or for costs, against the claimant, the clerk of the court in which such judgment is rendered shall make and transmit a certified copy thereof on application of the Attorney General or other counsel on behalf of the state, to the clerk of the district court of any county within the state and the same shall thereupon be filed and recorded in such court and become and be a judgment thereof. All judgments against the claimant or plaintiff shall be collected by execution as other judgments in the district courts.

Laws 1877, § 13, p. 23;

R.S.1913, § 1189;

C.S.1922, § 1111;

C.S.1929, § 27-330;

R.S.1943, § 24-330;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-330;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 33.